Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-166
National Guard; armed forces of United States; member; discharge by employer; violation; penalty.

Any person, firm, or organization, who discharges an employee because of his membership in the National Guard of this state or his fulfillment of military duty in the active service of the state or of the United States, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor, and, in addition thereto, shall restore the employee to a position of like seniority, status, and pay.

Laws 1955, c. 213, § 3, p. 599;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-190;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 64, p. 1603;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 52.